Utah statutes.
31A-4-107.   Other business.
(1)  As used in this section, "business reasonably incidental to insurance
business" includes:
(a)  in the case of an insurer authorized to transact title insurance:
(i)  preparing or selling abstracts of title and related documents; and
(ii)  providing escrow services in connection with real estate transactions,
or other services incidental to the sale or transfer of insurance related to
the sale or transfer of real property, except the sale of other kinds of
insurance related to the sale or transfer of real property; and
(b)  the business that could be done through subsidiaries authorized under
Subsection 31A-5-218(3) or, in the case of a nondomestic insurer, through
corporations that would be authorized under Subsection 31A-5-218(3) if the
insurer were a domestic insurer.
(2)  No domestic insurer may engage, directly or indirectly, in any business
other than insurance and business reasonably incidental to its insurance
business, except as specifically authorized by Section 31A-5-218 or other law
in this state.
(3)  No nondomestic insurer may engage in this state in any business forbidden
to a domestic insurer, nor may the insurer engage in that type of business
elsewhere if the commissioner orders the nondomestic insurer to cease doing
that type of business upon finding that doing that business is not consistent
with the interests of its insureds, creditors, or the public in this state.
